Utah statutes.
59-2-924.1.   Commission authorized to adjust taxing entity's certified rate
for clerical error -- Requirements -- Amount of adjustment.
(1)  For purposes of this section:
(a)  "Clerical error" means the following in an assessment roll:
(i)  an omission;
(ii)  an error; or
(iii)  a defect in form.
(b)  "Year" means the period beginning on January 1 and ending on December 31
during which there is a clerical error on the taxing entity’s assessment
roll.
(2)  The commission shall adjust a taxing entity’s certified tax rate as
provided in Subsection (3) if the county legislative body in which the taxing
entity is located certifies to the commission in writing that:
(a)  the taxing entity’s assessment roll contained a clerical error;
(b)  the county adjusted the clerical error on the assessment roll;
(c)  the taxing entity’s actual collections for the year were different than
the taxing entity’s budgeted collections for the year; and
(d)  the taxing entity notified the county legislative body of the clerical
error after the county treasurer mailed the tax notices under Section
59-2-1317, but no later than 60 days after the day on which the county
treasurer made the final annual settlement with the taxing entity under
Section 59-2-1365.
(3) (a)  The adjustment under Subsection (2) is an amount equal to the lesser
of:
(i)  the difference between the taxing entity’s budgeted collections for the
year and the taxing entity’s actual collections for the year; or
(ii)  the amount of the clerical error.
(b)  The commission shall make an adjustment under Subsection (2) no later
than 90 days after the day on which the county treasurer made the final annual
settlement with the taxing entity under Section 59-2-1365.
